Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,239.01
Risk Management
Program; risk management and state claims division of the Department of Administrative
Services; established; Risk Manager; powers and duties.

(1)
For purposes of sections 81-8,239.01 to 81-8,239.08 and 81-8,239.11, unless
the context otherwise requires, the definition of state agencies found in
section 81-8,210 shall apply, except that such term shall not include the
Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska.

(2) There is hereby established a division within the Department
of Administrative Services to be known as the risk management and state claims
division. The division shall be headed by the Risk Manager who shall be appointed
by the Director of Administrative Services. The division shall be responsible
for the Risk Management Program, which program is hereby created. The program
shall consist of the systematic identification of exposures to risk of loss
as provided in sections 11-201 to 11-203, 13-911, 25-2165, 43-1320, 44-1615,
44-1616, 48-194, 48-197, 48-1,103, 48-1,104, 48-1,107, 48-1,109, 81-8,212,
81-8,220, 81-8,225, 81-8,226, 81-8,233, 81-8,239.01 to 81-8,239.08, 81-8,239.11, 81-8,300, and 81-1801.02 and shall include the appropriate
methods for dealing with such exposures in relation to the state budget pursuant
to such sections. Such program shall be administered by the Risk Manager and
shall include the operations of the State Claims Board and other operations
provided in such sections.

(3) Under the Risk Management Program, the Risk Manager shall
have the authority and responsibility to:

(a) Employ any personnel necessary to administer the Risk
Management Program;

(b) Develop and maintain loss and exposure data on all state
property and liability risks;

(c) Develop and recommend risk reduction or elimination programs
for the state and its agencies and establish, implement, and monitor a statewide
safety program;

(d) Determine which risk exposures shall be insured and which
risk exposures shall be self-insured or assumed by the state;

(e) Establish standards for the purchase of necessary insurance
coverage or risk management services at the lowest costs, consistent with
good underwriting practices and sound risk management techniques;

(f) Be the exclusive negotiating and contracting agency to
purchase insurance or risk management services and, after consultation with
the state agency for which the insurance or services are purchased, enter
into such contracts on behalf of the state and its agencies, officials, and
employees to the extent deemed necessary and in the best interest of the state,
and authorize payment for such purchase out of the appropriate funds created
by section 81-8,239.02;

(g) Determine whether the state suffered a loss for which
self-insured property loss funds have been created and authorize and administer
payments for such loss from the State Self-Insured Property Fund for the purpose
of replacing or rebuilding state property;

(h) Perform all duties assigned to the Risk Manager under
the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act and sections 11-201 to 11-203, 81-8,239.05,
81-8,239.07, 81-8,239.11, and 84-1601 to 84-1615;

(i) Approve the use of risk management pools by any department,
agency, board, bureau, commission, or council of the State of Nebraska; and

(j) Recommend to the Legislature such legislation as may
be necessary to carry out the purposes of the Risk Management Program and
make appropriation requests for the administration of the program and the
funding of the separate funds administered by the Risk Manager.

(4) No official or employee of any entity created pursuant
to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint Public Agency Act shall be
considered a state official or employee for purposes of sections 81-8,239.01
to 81-8,239.06.

Laws 1981, LB 273, § 23;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 143;

Laws 1986, LB 1208, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 398, § 49;

Laws 1989, LB 326, § 2;

Laws 1989, LB 77, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 303, § 7;

Laws 1991, LB 81, § 7;

Laws 1992, LB 169, § 3;

Laws 1992, LB 560, § 2;

Laws 1992, Third Spec. Sess., LB 14, § 7;

Laws 1996, LB 1248, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 1252, § 1;

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 93;

Laws 2001, LB 3, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB256, § 6;

Laws 2011, LB390, § 15.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.

Joint Public Agency Act, see section 13-2501.

Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act, see section 48-1,110.